Vermont statutes. Title 11A Vermont Business Corporations
Subchapter 1. Right to Dissent and Obtain Payment for Shares

§ 13.01.
Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Corporation” means the issuer of the shares held by a dissenter before the corporate action, or the surviving or acquiring corporation by merger or share exchange of that issuer.

“Dissenter” means a shareholder who is entitled to dissent from corporate action under section 13.02 of this title and who exercises that right when and in the manner required by sections 13.20 through 13.28 of this title.

“Fair value,” with respect to a dissenter’s shares, means the value of the shares immediately before the effectuation of the corporate action to which the dissenter objects, excluding any appreciation or depreciation in anticipation of the corporate action unless exclusion would be inequitable.

“Interest” means interest from the effective date of the corporate action until the date of payment, at the average rate currently paid by the corporation on its principal bank loans or, if none, at a rate that is fair and equitable under all the circumstances.

“Record shareholder” means the person in whose name shares are registered in the records of a corporation or the beneficial owner of shares to the extent of the rights granted by a nominee certificate on file with a corporation.

“Beneficial shareholder” means the person who is a beneficial owner of shares held by a nominee as the record shareholder.

“Shareholder” means the record shareholder or the beneficial shareholder.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 13.02.
Right to dissent.

A shareholder is entitled to dissent from, and obtain payment of the fair value of his or her shares in the event of, any of the following corporate actions:

Merger. Consummation of a plan of merger to which the corporation is a party:

if shareholder approval is required for the merger by section 11.10 of this title or the articles of incorporation and the shareholder is entitled to vote on the merger; or

if the corporation is a subsidiary that is merged with its parent under section 11.08 of this title.

Share exchange. Consummation of a plan of share exchange to which the corporation is a party as the corporation whose shares will be acquired, if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the plan.

Conversion. Consummation of a plan of conversion pursuant to section 11.03 of this title to which the corporation is a party unless the shareholders of the corporation will have the same dissenters’ rights after conversion to the converted organization as they hold before conversion.

Domestication. Consummation of a plan of domestication pursuant to section 11.14 of this title to which the corporation is a party unless the shareholders of the corporation will have the same dissenters’ rights after domestication to the domesticated organization as they hold before domestication.

Sale of assets. Consummation of a sale or exchange of all, or substantially all, of the property of the corporation other than in the usual and regular course of business, if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the sale or exchange, including a sale in dissolution, but not including a sale pursuant to court order or a sale for cash pursuant to a plan by which all or substantially all of the net proceeds of the sale will be distributed to the shareholders within one year after the date of sale.

Amendment to articles. An amendment of the articles of incorporation that materially and adversely affects rights in respect of a dissenter’s shares because it:

alters or abolishes a preferential right of the shares;

creates, alters, or abolishes a right in respect of redemption, including a provision respecting a sinking fund for the redemption or repurchase, of the shares;

alters or abolishes a preemptive right of the holder of the shares to acquire shares or other securities;

excludes or limits the right of the shares to vote on any matter, or to cumulate votes, other than a limitation by dilution through issuance of shares or other securities with similar voting rights; or

reduces the number of shares owned by the shareholder to a fraction of a share if the fractional share so created is to be acquired for cash under section 6.04 of this title.

Market exception. Any corporate action taken pursuant to a shareholder vote to the extent the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors provides that voting or nonvoting shareholders are entitled to dissent and obtain payment for their shares.

A shareholder entitled to dissent and obtain payment for his or her shares under this chapter may not challenge the corporate action creating his or her entitlement unless the action is unlawful or fraudulent with respect to the shareholder or the corporation.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994; amended

2015, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § E.2, eff. July 1, 2017.

§ 13.03.
Dissent by nominees and beneficial owners.

A record shareholder may assert dissenters’ rights as to fewer than all the shares registered in his or her name only if he or she dissents with respect to all shares beneficially owned by any one person and notifies the corporation in writing of the name and address of each person on whose behalf he or she asserts dissenters’ rights. The rights of a partial dissenter under this subsection are determined as if the shares as to which the shareholder dissents and the shareholder’s other shares were registered in the names of different shareholders.

A beneficial shareholder may assert dissenters’ rights as to shares held on his or her behalf only if:

he or she submits to the corporation the record shareholder’s written consent to the dissent not later than the time the beneficial shareholder asserts dissenters’ rights; and

he or she does so with respect to all shares of which he or she is the beneficial shareholder or over which he or she has power to direct the vote.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.